Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-231
Veterans preference; county attorney; duties.

The county attorneys, in their respective counties, shall prosecute, before any court of appropriate jurisdiction, all persons charged with violating sections 48-225 to 48-231.

Laws 1969, c. 751, § 7, p. 2827;

Laws 2002, LB 722, § 2.